Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-314. Duties of election officials — Voter lists.

The election officials shall total the number of voters on the list of voters form, and the lists shall be certified and attested to by the election officials.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 16; 1971, No. 261, § 13; 1973, No. 157, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-716; Acts 1987, No. 247, § 3; 1993, No. 512, § 2; 1995, No. 946, § 8; 1995, No. 963, § 8; 1997, No. 451, § 25; 2007, No. 1020, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “Voters in line at closing time” from the end of the section heading; deleted former (a) through (c); deleted the subsection (d) designation; and substituted “shall total the number of voters on the list of voters form” for “shall total the number of voters on the voter lists.”

7-5-315. Counting votes for unopposed and deceased candidates.

(a)(1)

The votes received by an unopposed candidate in any election held in this state may be counted or tabulated for administrative purposes but shall not be certified, unless otherwise provided by law, by the election officials. The word “UNOPPOSED” shall be inserted on the tally sheet to indicate that the candidate has received a majority of the votes cast in the election. However, the votes received by an unopposed candidate for the office of Mayor, Governor, and Circuit Clerk shall be counted and tabulated by the election officials.

(2)

All other unopposed candidates shall be declared and certified as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

(b)(1)

The votes received by any person whose name appeared on the ballot and who withdrew or died after the certification of the ballot shall be counted.

(2)(A)

If the person received enough votes to win the election, a vacancy in election shall be declared.

(B)(i)

If the person received enough votes to qualify for a runoff, the person's name shall appear on the runoff ballot.

(ii)

If enough votes are cast for the person to win the runoff, then a vacancy in election shall exist.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-717; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 8; 1991, No. 530, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 26; 2003, No. 994, § 7; 2007, No. 1020, § 11; 2009, No. 1480, § 28; 2017, No. 730, § 2; 2019, No. 1013, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “paper ballots” for “ballots” in the section heading and the introductory paragraph; substituted “handwritten on the ballot” for “written on” in (2); substituted “marks for more . . . the voter's intent” for “a greater number of names for any one (1) office than the number of persons required to fill the office, it shall be considered fraudulent as to the whole of the names designated to fill the office, but no further” in (4); deleted former (8); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); rewrote (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “in any election held in this state may be counted or tabulated for administrative purposes, but shall not be certified, unless otherwise provided by law, by the election officials. The word ‘UNOPPOSED’ shall be inserted on the tally sheet to indicate that the candidate has received a majority of the votes cast in the election. However, the votes received by an unopposed candidate”; and made stylistic changes.

7-5-316. Presence of candidate — Designation of representatives.

(a)

After the polls have been closed, the counting of votes shall be open to the public, and any candidate or political party may be present in person or by representative designated in writing pursuant to §7-5-312 at the count of the ballots in any election for the purpose of determining whether or not the ballots in any election precinct are fairly and accurately counted.

(b)

The representatives of political parties may be designated and authorized by either the chair or the secretary of the state or county committee, and representatives of candidates may be designated and authorized by the candidate represented.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 15; 1971, No. 261, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-715; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 27; 2003, No. 1154, § 2; 2009, No. 1480, § 29.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted the last sentence in (a).

7-5-317. Processing and delivery of election materials.

(a)

After the polls close, all of the election materials shall be processed and delivered in the following manner:

(1)

The poll workers shall total the number of voters on the list-of-voters form and certify and attest the form;

(2)

The list-of-voters form, precinct voter registration list, voter registration application forms, and other recordkeeping supplies shall be delivered to the county clerk;

(3)

Certificates of election results and tally sheets:

(A)

One (1) copy of the certificate of election results with one (1) copy of the tally sheets, if any, shall be delivered to the county clerk; and

(B)

One (1) copy of the certificate of election results shall be returned with one (1) copy of the tally sheets, if any, and reports of challenges of voters, if any, to the county board of election commissioners;

(4)

Ballots:

(A)

The poll workers shall securely envelope any voted ballots separately from any unused ballots and place the ballots in a container with a numbered seal and then deliver the ballots with the tally sheets, if any, and other election materials to the county board of election commissioners; and

(B)

All cancelled ballots shall be preserved separately from the other ballots and returned to the county board of election commissioners; and

(5)

Sealed stub boxes shall be delivered to the county board of election commissioners for storage.

(b)

All of the election materials, stub boxes, and returns shall be delivered to the county board of election commissioners by the poll workers immediately after the polls close.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-718; 1995, No. 946, § 9; Acts 1995, No. 963, § 9; 1997, No. 451, § 28; 2001, No. 797, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 9; 2009, No. 959, § 15; 2009, No. 1480, § 30; 2013, No. 236, § 1; 2017, No. 621, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 inserted (a)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly; and in (a)(4)(A) and (b), substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” and inserted “of election commissioners.”

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 rewrote (a); and substituted “poll workers” for “election official” in (b).

The 2013 amendment inserted “or to the county treasurer in the case of the stub boxes” in (b).

The 2017 amendment substituted “county board of election commissioners” for “county treasurer” in (a)(5); and, in (b), inserted “stub boxes” and deleted “or to the county treasurer, in the case of the stub boxes” following “election commissioners”.

7-5-318. Failure to deliver materials — Penalty — Messenger to obtain delinquent returns.

(a)

If the poll workers fail to deliver the ballots, ballot stubs, certification of election, voter lists, and other election returns in the manner provided for in §7-5-317, the poll workers shall forfeit the sum of two hundred dollars ($200) to be recovered by action of debt in the name of the state for the use of the county.

(b)

Upon failure of delivery of the election returns immediately after the polls close, the county board of election commissioners shall dispatch a peace officer to obtain the election returns, and all expenses incurred by sending the messenger shall be paid by the defaulting poll workers.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-719; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 29; 2001, No. 798, § 1; 2009, No. 959, § 15.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in three places.

7-5-319. Recount.

(a)(1)

Any candidate voted for who may be dissatisfied with the returns from any precinct shall have a recount of the votes cast therein upon the candidate's presenting the county board of election commissioners with a petition requesting the recount.

(2)

When the number of outstanding absentee ballots of overseas voters is not sufficient to change the results of the election, the candidate must present the petition no later than two (2) days after the county board of election commissioners declares preliminary and unofficial results of the election, including a statement of the number of outstanding absentee ballots of overseas voters.

(3)

When the number of outstanding absentee ballots of overseas voters is sufficient to potentially change the results of the election, the candidate must present the petition at any time before the county board of election commissioners finally completes the canvass of the returns of the election and certifies the result.

(b)

At the time that the petition requesting the recount is presented, the county board of election commissioners shall provide to the candidate requesting the recount a copy of the test results on the voting machines and the electronic vote tabulating devices. Only one (1) recount per candidate per election shall be permitted. The county board of election commissioners shall certify the results of the last recount. The county board of election commissioners may upon its own motion conduct a recount of the returns from any or all precincts.

(c)(1)

For any recount of an election in which ballots are cast using a direct recording electronic voting machine with a voter-verified paper audit trail, the voter-verified paper audit trail shall serve as the official ballot to be recounted.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners either may:

(A)

Manually sum the total votes for each candidate involved in the recount that is printed on the voter-verified paper audit trail; or

(B)

Count by hand the votes for each candidate involved in the recount as shown on the voter-verified paper audit trail.

(3)

If the voter-verified paper audit trail is damaged or for some other reason is incapable of being used for a recount, the paper record produced by the machine for manual audit shall be the official ballot to be recounted.

(4)

If the voting machine is exempt from the requirement to have a voter-verified paper audit trail and does not have one, the paper record produced by the machine for manual audit shall be the official ballot to be recounted.

(5)

If the county board of election commissioners counts by hand the votes for each candidate involved in the recount, the county board of election commissioners may check the back of the ballot to see if the ballot has been initialed by an election official.

(d)

For the recount of an election in which paper ballots are used, the county board of election commissioners shall open the package containing the ballots and recount the ballots in the manner prescribed by law for the count to be made by the election officials in the first instance, or if there is a determination by the county board of election commissioners that the voting machine or electronic vote tabulating device may be malfunctioning, it may recount the ballots by any manner prescribed by law.

(e)

The result as found upon the recount, if it differs from that certified by the election officials, shall be included in the canvass as the vote for the particular precinct for which the recount was ordered and made.

(f)

After the recount is completed, the ballots shall again be sealed and kept as provided by law.

(g)(1)

The costs for any recount must be borne by the candidate petitioning for it, and payment of the costs must be made to the county board of election commissioners prior to the recount in an amount determined by the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

In the event that the outcome of the election is altered by recount, the costs of the recount shall be refunded to the candidate who petitioned for the recount.

(h)

The costs of any recount shall be based on the actual costs incurred to conduct the recount, but in no instance shall the amount charged to conduct a recount exceed the rate of twenty-five cents (25¢) per vote cast in the precincts where the recount is requested or a total of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the entire county, whichever is less.

(i)

Within forty-eight (48) hours after a petition for recount is filed, the county board of election commissioners shall notify all candidates whose election could be affected by the outcome of the recount.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-508; Acts 1993, No. 430, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 30; 1999, No. 1023, § 1; 2001, No. 1475, § 4; 2003, No. 1038, § 1; 2003, No. 1165, § 5; 2005, No. 2233, § 7; 2009, No. 1480, § 31; 2019, No. 534, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (c)(2) through (c)(4).

The 2019 amendment added (c)(5).

7-5-320. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning elections to fill a vacancy when there is only one candidate, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 32. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 122, § 1.

7-5-321, 7-5-322. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the procedure when the voter fails to provide proof of identity and voter identification cards, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 633, § 8. The sections were derived from the following sources:

7-5-321.
Acts 2013, No. 595, § 5.

7-5-322.
Acts 2013, No. 595, § 5.

7-5-323. Procedure when voter fails to provide verification of registration.

If a ballot or absentee ballot is deemed a provisional ballot for failure to provide verification of registration under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, the voter shall comply with the procedures under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, for his or her vote to be counted.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 633, § 9.

7-5-324. Voter verification card.

(a)(1)(A)

The Secretary of State shall provide by rule for the issuance of a voter verification card that may be requested by an individual to be used to verify his or her voter registration under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, when appearing to vote in person or by absentee ballot.

(B)

The rules shall include without limitation:

(i)

A requirement that the voter verification card include a photograph of the voter;

(ii)

Specification of the information to be included on the voter verification card;

(iii)

Provisions concerning the expiration of a voter verification card; and

(iv)

Provisions for the voter verification card to be provided by the county clerk of the county in which the voter is registered to vote.

(2)

Providing for the issuance of a voter verification card under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section may include without limitation the purchase by the Secretary of State of cameras and other equipment necessary to generate a voter verification card in the office of the county clerk.

(b)

A voter verification card shall be issued without the payment of a fee or charge to an individual who:

(1)

Does not have another valid form of identification meeting the requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13; and

(2)(A)

Is registered to vote; or

(B)

Will be at least eighteen (18) years of age at the next election and has timely submitted a voter registration application.

(c)(1)

The Secretary of State or the county clerk shall not require or accept payment for a voter verification card issued for the sole purpose of voter verification.

(2)

A person requesting a voter verification card for the sole purpose of voter verification shall sign an affidavit that he or she does not possess a valid form of identification meeting the requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 633, § 9.

Subchapter 4

— Absentee Voting

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 3: Approved Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws do not allow the use of voting machines for absentee balloting; that some counties of this state are not equipped for voting other than with voting machines; that prevention of such voting causes a great confusion; that an election may be held before ninety (90) days after the adjournment of this session and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 4: approved Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the election laws provide a different closing time for casting absentee ballots than that for casting ballots at the polls on election day; that elections are, and will continue to be, held while this erroneous difference in time exists making the procedure for casting absentee ballots confusing and discriminating, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 739, § 3: Mar. 24, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act are essential for administering the election laws of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 12: Emergency clause failed. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution becomes effective on July 1, 2001; that this implements the nonpartisan election of justices and judges as mandated by Amendment 80; and that to effectively implement Amendment 80, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7, provided: “This act shall become effective upon the later of the following:

“(1)

January 1, 2014; or

“(2)

The appropriation and availability of funding to the Secretary of State for the issuance of voter identification cards under Section 5 of this act.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 14 and 15, § 8: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that school districts that have chosen to hold their annual school election in November of this year are currently required to print separate ballots from the general election ballots at an extraordinary and unnecessary expense to taxpayers; that some voters in the annual school election this November will have to vote at a separate location for the general election and for the annual school election even though the elections are held on the same day which may decrease voter turnout and infringe upon the suffrage rights of those voters; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure the voting rights of all citizens of Arkansas and to eliminate unnecessary election costs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 910, § 8: Jan. 1, 2018.

7-5-401. Duties of county clerk.

(a)

The county clerk shall be the custodian of the absentee ballots and early voting ballots for any early voting conducted by the county clerk.

(b)

The county clerk shall be furnished a suitable room at the county courthouse or other location designated for the purpose of exercising all the powers and duties concerning the application for, the issuance of, and the voting of absentee and early voting ballots required by law of the county clerk.

(c)

In counties with more than one (1) county seat, the county clerk shall conduct:

(1)

Absentee voting in the courthouse or other room provided by the county; and

(2)

Early voting at the county clerk's designated early voting location in each county seat if the county clerk conducts early voting under §7-5-418.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-901; Acts 1995, No. 686, § 1; 1995, No. 948, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 10; 2007, No. 556, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added the (a) and (b) designations; deleted “at the courthouse” following “clerk” in (a); substituted “or other location designated for the purpose of exercising” for “and shall exercise” in (b); and added (c)

7-5-402. Voter qualification.

The following persons, if possessing the qualifications of electors, may cast an absentee ballot in any election:

(1)

Any person who will be unavoidably absent from his or her voting place on the day of the election; and

(2)

Any person who will be unable to attend the polls on election day because of illness or physical disability.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-903; Acts 1993, No. 593, § 1; 1995, No. 686, § 2; 1995, No. 948, § 2.

7-5-403. Designated bearers, authorized agents, and administrators.

(a)(1)

A designated bearer may obtain absentee ballots for no more than two (2) voters per election.

(2)(A)

A designated bearer shall not have more than two (2) absentee ballots in his or her possession at any time.

(B)

If the county clerk knows or reasonably suspects that a designated bearer has more than two (2) absentee ballots in his or her possession, the county clerk shall notify the prosecuting attorney.

(3)(A)

A designated bearer receiving an absentee ballot from the county clerk for a voter shall obtain the absentee ballot directly from the county clerk and deliver the absentee ballot directly to the voter.

(B)

A designated bearer receiving an absentee ballot from a voter shall obtain the absentee ballot directly from the voter and deliver the absentee ballot directly to the county clerk.

(4)(A)

A designated bearer may deliver to the county clerk the absentee ballots for not more than two (2) voters.

(B)

The designated bearer shall be named on the voter statement accompanying the absentee ballot.

(5)

In order to obtain an absentee ballot from the county clerk:

(A)

The designated bearer shall show a form of current photographic identification to the county clerk;

(B)

The county clerk shall print the designated bearer's name and address beside the voter's name on a register;

(C)

The designated bearer shall sign the register under oath indicating receipt of the voter's absentee ballot; and

(D)

The county clerk shall indicate beside the designated bearer's name on the register that he or she obtained an absentee ballot for a voter.

(6)

When a designated bearer delivers an absentee ballot to the county clerk:

(A)

The designated bearer shall present current and valid photographic identification to the county clerk;

(B)

The county clerk shall print the designated bearer's name and address beside the voter's name on a register;

(C)

The designated bearer shall sign the register under oath indicating delivery of the voter's absentee ballot;

(D)

The county clerk shall not accept an absentee ballot from a designated bearer who does not sign the register under oath; and

(E)

The county clerk shall write or stamp the word “BEARER” and write the designated bearer's name and address on the voter's absentee ballot return envelope.

(7)

When providing an absentee ballot to a designated bearer or receiving an absentee ballot from a designated bearer, the county clerk shall provide to the designated bearer a written notice informing the designated bearer that:

(A)

A designated bearer may obtain ballots for no more than two (2) voters per election;

(B)

A designated bearer shall at no time have more than two (2) ballots in his or her possession;

(C)

A designated bearer shall not deliver ballots to the county clerk for more than two (2) voters per election; and

(D)

Possession of an absentee ballot with the intent to defraud a voter or an election official is a felony under §7-1-104.

(8)

The county clerk shall post a notice of the rules concerning designated bearers and authorized agents in each county clerk's office where absentee ballots are distributed or returned.

(b)(1)

An authorized agent may deliver applications for absentee ballots to the county clerk and obtain absentee ballots from the county clerk for not more than two (2) voters per election who cannot cast a ballot at the appropriate polling place on election day because the voter is a patient in a hospital or long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state.

(2)

At no time shall an authorized agent have more than two (2) absentee ballots in his or her possession.

(3)(A)

An authorized agent receiving an absentee ballot from the county clerk for a voter shall deliver the absentee ballot directly to the voter.

(B)

An authorized agent receiving an absentee ballot from a voter shall deliver the absentee ballot directly to the county clerk.

(4)(A)

In order for an authorized agent to obtain a ballot from the county clerk, the authorized agent shall submit to the county clerk an affidavit from the administrative head of a hospital or long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state that the applicant is a patient of the hospital or long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state and is thereby unable to vote on the election day at his or her regular polling site.

(B)

A copy of the affidavit shall be retained by the county clerk as an attachment to the application for an absentee ballot.

(5)

In order to obtain an absentee ballot from the county clerk, the:

(A)

Authorized agent shall present current photographic identification to the clerk;

(B)

Clerk shall print the authorized agent's name and address beside the voter's name on a register; and

(C)

Authorized agent shall sign the register under oath indicating receipt of the voter's ballot.

(6)

When an authorized agent delivers an absentee ballot to the county clerk, the:

(A)

Authorized agent shall show some form of current photographic identification to the clerk;

(B)

Clerk shall print the authorized agent's name and address beside the voter's name on a register;

(C)

Authorized agent shall sign the register under oath indicating delivery of the voter's ballot; and

(D)

The county clerk shall not accept an absentee ballot from an authorized agent who does not sign the register under oath.

(7)

The county clerk shall write or stamp the words “AUTHORIZED AGENT” and the agent's name and address on the voter's absentee ballot return envelope.

(8)

The county clerk shall post a notice of the rules concerning designated bearers and authorized agents in each county clerk's office where absentee ballots are distributed or returned.

(c)(1)

The county clerk shall keep a register of designated bearers and authorized agents.

(2)

The designated bearer and authorized agent register shall contain the following oath on each page: “I ACKNOWLEDGE THAT ARKANSAS LAW PROHIBITS DESIGNATED BEARERS AND AUTHORIZED AGENTS FROM RECEIVING OR RETURNING MORE THAN TWO (2) ABSENTEE BALLOTS PER ELECTION. I HAVE COMPLIED WITH THE ARKANSAS LAW. I UNDERSTAND THAT IF I PROVIDE FALSE INFORMATION ON THIS FORM, I MAY BE GUILTY OF PERJURY AND SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS ($10,000) OR IMPRISONMENT FOR UP TO TEN (10) YEARS, OR BOTH, UNDER FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS.”

(d)(1)(A)

An administrator may deliver to the county clerk an application for an absentee ballot for any voter who is a patient of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state and who authorizes the administrator to obtain an absentee ballot on his or her behalf.

(B)

The absentee ballot application shall identify the administrator by name as the administrator of the facility where the voter resides.

(2)

Upon presentation of photographic identification to the county clerk, an administrator may receive absentee ballots for as many qualified residents of the facility as:

(A)

Apply for absentee ballots; and

(B)

Identify the administrator in the voter's absentee ballot application.

(3)(A)

An administrator may deliver the absentee ballot to the county clerk for any voter who names the administrator on his or her application and voter statement.

(B)

Absentee ballots may be delivered to the county clerk in person by the administrator or by mail.

(4)

Before obtaining an absentee ballot, an administrator shall submit to the county clerk an affidavit, signed and dated by the administrator, stating:

(A)

That he or she is the administrative head of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state;

(B)

The name and address of the facility;

(C)

That he or she has been authorized by the voters who reside in his or her facility to obtain from the county clerk and return to the county clerk absentee ballots on their behalf;

(D)

That each of the voters for whom the administrator seeks to obtain an absentee ballot has named the administrator on his or her application; and

(E)

That the administrator understands that Arkansas law requires that the administrator assist the voter by marking or casting a ballot on behalf of the voter without any comment or interpretation.

(5)

The county clerk shall attach a copy of the administrator's affidavit to each application for an absentee ballot delivered by the administrator to the county clerk.

(6)

When the ballots are returned by the administrator in person or by mail, the county clerk shall write or stamp the word “ADMINISTRATOR” and write the administrator's name on the voter's absentee ballot return envelope.

(e)

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement on an affidavit required by this section shall be guilty of perjury and subject to a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisonment of up to ten (10) years.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 543, § 2; 2009, No. 250, §§ 15-17; 2009, No. 959, §§ 16, 22; 2011, No. 1043, § 1; 2013, No. 1424, § 2; 2019, No. 965, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was formerly codified as §7-5-419.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §
7-5-403 has been renumbered by Acts 2009, No. 959, § 22 as §7-5-404.

Former §
7-5-419 has been renumbered by Acts 2009, No. 959, § 22 as §7-5-403.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250 inserted “designated” preceding “bearer” in (a)(4)(B) and (a)(5)(B); inserted “county” preceding “clerk” throughout (a)(5) and (a)(6); inserted “absentee” preceding “ballot” in (a)(5)(C) and (a)(6)(C); and inserted “and valid” in (a)(6)(A).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 deleted “deliver applications for absentee ballots to the county clerk and” following “bearer may” in (a)(1); deleted “On the day of an election” at the beginning of (b)(1), and made related changes; and inserted “by the administrator” in (d)(3)(B).

The 2011 amendment added (a)(2)(B), (a)(5)(D), (a)(6)(D), and (a)(7).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1424, in (a)(1), deleted “from the county clerk” following “ballots” and inserted “per election” at the end; inserted “obtain the absentee ballot directly from the county clerk and” or similar language in (a)(3)(A) and (a)(3)(B); substituted “When a designated bearer delivers” for “Upon delivering” or similar language in (a)(6) and (b)(6); inserted “per election” in (a)(7)(A), (a)(7)(C) and (b)(1); added (a)(6)(E), (a)(8), (b)(6)(D), (b)(7), (b)(8), (d)(1)(B), (d)(2)(B), (d)(4)(D), (d)(5) and (d)(6); and rewrote (c)(2), (d)(1)(A), (d)(2) and (d)(4).

The 2019 amendment added (d)(4)(E).